Wisconsin, session 2025, AB745.
do enact as follows:AB745,11Section 1. 45.60 (1) (a) 6. of the statutes is created to read:AB745,2,4245.60 (1) (a) 6. A person who was naturalized pursuant to section 2 (1) of the 3federal Hmong Veterans’ Naturalization Act of 2000, P.L. 106-207, and who was 4residing in this state at the time of death.AB745,25Section 2. 45.60 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB745,2,15645.60 (2) Stipends. From the appropriation under s. 20.485 (2) (sm), the 7department shall reimburse a local unit of a member organization of the council on 8veterans programs or a local unit of a veterans organization certified by the 9department to provide military funeral honors for the costs of providing military 10funeral honors in this state to a person described in sub. (1). The reimbursement 11may not exceed $50 $85 for each funeral for which military honors are provided, 12except that the department shall annually adjust this amount on July 1 to reflect 13any changes in the U.S. consumer price index for all urban consumers, U.S. city 14average, as determined by the U.S. department of labor, for the 12-month period 15ending on the preceding December 31.AB745,2,1616